District of Columbia statutes.
1-15-18

Prepared by the Mayor and transmitted to the Council of the District of Columbia on July 14, 1988, pursuant to the provisions of Section 422(12) of the Charter of the District of Columbia.

I. Purpose

This plan changes the name of the Educational Institution Licensure Commission to the Education Licensure Commission and transfers the function of licensing and otherwise regulating proprietary schools from the Director, Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs to the Education Licensure Commission.

II. Change of Name

The Education Institution Licensure Commission, established by § 3 of the D.C. Law 1-104, the Education Licensure Commission Act of 1976, D.C. Code § 31-1603 [§ 38-1303], is hereby renamed the Education Licensure Commission.

III. Transfer of Functions

The functions with respect to proprietary schools vested in the Director of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs by Council Regulation No. 71-30, as amended, 16 DCMR § 1200 et seq., Commissioner’s Order 71-458 (December 28, 1971), Mayor’s Order 78-42 (February 17, 1978), Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, and Mayor’s Order 83-92 (April 7, 1983) are hereby transferred to the Education Licensure Commission.

IV. Organization

The Mayor is authorized to organize the personnel and property of the Commission to fulfill the functions transferred by this plan.

V. Effective Dates

This Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1988 shall become effective pursuant to the promulgation of an executive order of the Mayor establishing the same no later than thirty (30) calendar days after this plan has been approved in accordance with § 422(12) of the District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, Public Law 93-198, D.C. Code § 1-242(12) [§ 1-204.22].

MAYOR’S STATEMENT

Education is one of the highest priorities of my administration. I am dedicated to expanding educational opportunities for our citizens and improving the educational system in the District of Columbia, both public and private. This is a cornerstone of our programs for economic development and self-sufficiency.

As a step in this continuing effort, I have decided to consolidate some of the District of Columbia educational authorities and services, and to strengthen the role of the District Government in the area of postsecondary education. One such consolidation and strengthening is this Reorganization Plan, and the accompanying proposed amended regulations for proprietary schools.

In general, the proprietary schools have served the community well. They have provided trade, technical and self-improvement instruction beyond the high school level to students who did not seek a college education, but who aspired to careers requiring other kinds of knowledge, skills, and abilities. In many instances, these students became employable by this instruction, and upwardly mobile in their chosen field of work. Thus, the proprietary schools provide a service that has important results for the economy of the District, as well as the lives of individual citizens.

However, experience has shown that the provision of poor instruction or unexpected closure by a few such schools can have a serious harmful effect on the students. Students typically borrow significant amounts to pay tuition, and if they are left with unmarketable skills or a prematurely terminated education, they may be worse off than before matriculation. In such cases, the individual and his or her family suffers. So too do the other schools, who rely on their reputations to do business. And so too, does the District of Columbia, which loses not only the opportunity for adding to the available skilled work force, but also the opportunity for decreasing the demand for financial assistance to unemployed or underemployed residents.

For these reasons, it has become clear that strengthening the regulation of proprietary schools is in the public interest. Therefore, I have decided to transfer this function to the Educational Institution Licensure Commission, and change its name to the Education Licensure Commission. The Commission now licenses and regulates private institutions that offer college level education, and serves as the State Approving Agency for education programs eligible for veterans who get assistance from the Veterans Administration. The Commission members are qualified members of the higher education profession, with experience and expertise in regulating postsecondary educational institutions. The Commission has a fine record of protecting the community from college level diploma mills, and improving the education available to citizens of the District of Columbia.

In considering this additional assignment, the Commission has determined that amendments to the existing regulations are required. The Commission has prepared proposed amended regulations, which provide new educational criteria for licensing, new requirements for student records, and new authority for monitoring schools’ compliance with the regulations. All of the business licensing requirements are retained. These proposed amended regulations are transmitted with this Plan for Council approval.

An increase in the cost of regulating proprietary schools will result from these steps. However, the increase is modest and will provide the resources for the Commission to carry out its new responsibilities.

The Plan and amended regulations will further integrate proprietary schools into the educational system in the District of Columbia, and provide the basis for improvements in the quality of instruction received by their students.

I urge the Council to join me in this improvement of our educational system, by approving the Reorganization Plan and the amended regulations.